Utah statutes.
4-21-5.   Revenue from fees to be used to promote beef industry -- Payment of revenue monthly to Utah Beef Council -- Deduction of costs of administration and processing funds -- Annual audit of books, records, and accounts -- Financial statement of audit published.

(1) (a)  All revenue derived from the collection of fees authorized by this chapter shall be used to promote the beef industry of the state and the revenue shall be paid to:

(i)  the Utah Beef Council, a Utah nonprofit corporation organized to promote Utah beef; or

(ii)  an agency, acceptable to the department, with the concurrence of the Utah Cattlemen's Association.

(b)  The revenue shall be paid monthly, as requested by the council or appointed agency, and the actual costs of administration for processing the funds shall be deducted before disbursing the funds.

(2) (a)  The books, records, and accounts of the Utah Beef Council or appointed agency shall be audited at least once annually by a licensed accountant.

(b)  The results of the audit shall be submitted to the commissioner, and a financial statement of the audit and a general statement of operations and promotional and advertising activities shall be published by the council or appointed agency in a major livestock publication having general circulation in Utah.

